Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.250

Board of adjustment—Removal.

Any member of the board of adjustment may be removed by the chair of the board with the approval of the board for inefficiency, neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4115; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.250. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 25.]